Utah statutes.
53A-1-406.   Acceptance of gifts, endowments, devises and bequests.

(1)  The State Board of Education, on its own behalf or on behalf of an educational institution for which the board is the direct governing body, may accept private grants, loans, gifts, endowments, devises, or bequests which are made for educational purposes.

(2)  These contributions are not subject to appropriation by the Legislature.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

